Washington statutes.
RCW 15.58.065

Protection of privileged or confidential information.

(1) In submitting data required by this chapter, the applicant may:

(a) Mark clearly any portions which in the applicant's opinion are trade secrets or commercial or financial information; and

(b) Submit such marked material separately from other material required to be submitted under this chapter.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter or other law, the director shall not make public information which in the director's judgment should be privileged or confidential because it contains or relates to trade secrets or commercial or financial information except that, when necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter, information relating to unpublished formulas of products acquired by authorization of this chapter may be revealed to any state or federal agency consulted and may be revealed at a public hearing or in findings of fact issued by the director when necessary under this chapter.

(3) If the director proposes to release for inspection information which the applicant or registrant believes to be protected from disclosure under subsection (2) of this section, the director shall notify the applicant or registrant in writing, by certified mail. The director shall not thereafter make available for inspection such data until thirty days after receipt of the notice by the applicant or registrant. During this period, the applicant or registrant may institute an action in the superior court of Thurston county for a declaratory judgment as to whether such information is subject to protection under subsection (2) of this section.

[ 1989 c 380 s 5; 1979 c 146 s 4.]